Vermont, session 2025-2026, H29.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Vermont Land Access and Opportunity Board * * *
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 325u is amended to read:
§ 325u. VERMONT LAND ACCESS AND OPPORTUNITY BOARD
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont Land Access and Opportunity
Board to promote improvements in access to woodlands, farmland, and land
and home ownership for Vermonters from historically marginalized or
disadvantaged communities who continue to face barriers to land and home
ownership. The Board shall be attached to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board for administrative purposes.
VT LEG #379264 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.29
2025 Page 2 of 4
(b) Organization of Board. The Board shall be composed of:
* * *
(11) one member, appointed by Vermont Psychiatric Survivors
MadFreedom, Inc.
* * *
* * * Health Equity Advisory Commission * * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 252 is amended to read:
§ 252. HEALTH EQUITY ADVISORY COMMISSION
(a) Creation. There is created the Health Equity Advisory Commission to
promote health equity and eradicate health disparities among Vermonters,
including particularly those who are Black, Indigenous, and Persons of Color;
individuals who are LGBTQ; and individuals with disabilities. The Advisory
Commission shall amplify the voices of impacted communities regarding
decisions made by the State that impact health equity, whether in the provision
of health care services or as the result of social determinants of health. The
Advisory Commission shall also provide strategic guidance on the
development of the Office of Health Equity, including recommendations on the
structure, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of such an office.
(b) Membership.
(1) The Advisory Commission shall be composed of the following
members:
VT LEG #379264 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.29
2025 Page 3 of 4
* * *
(T) a member, appointed by Vermont Psychiatric Survivors
MadFreedom, Inc.;
* * *
* * * Mental Health Crisis Response Commission * * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 7257a is amended to read:
§ 7257a. MENTAL HEALTH CRISIS RESPONSE COMMISSION
* * *
(c)(1) The Commission shall comprise the following members:
* * *
(H) an individual who has a personal experience of living with a
mental condition or psychiatric disability, appointed by Vermont Psychiatric
Survivors MadFreedom, Inc.;
* * *
* * * Mental Health Response Service Guidelines * * *
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 7260 is amended to read:
§ 7260. MENTAL HEALTH RESPONSE SERVICE GUIDELINES
(a) The Department shall develop guidelines for use by municipalities,
including use by emergency medical technicians and public safety personnel,
such as law enforcement officers as defined by 20 V.S.A. § 2351a and
firefighters as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 3151, who are employed, volunteer, or
VT LEG #379264 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.29
2025 Page 4 of 4
are under contract with a municipality. The guidelines shall recommend best
practices for de-escalation and for mental health response services, including
crisis response services. The Department shall make the guidelines available
to municipalities and publish the guidelines on the Department’s website.
(b) In developing the guidelines required pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, the Department shall consult with the following entities:
* * *
(5) the Vermont Psychiatric Survivors MadFreedom, Inc.;
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379264 v.1